Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Proceedings - Requirements and Limitations - Determination of Just Compensation

38-1-101.
Compensation - public use - commission - jury - court - prohibition on elimination of nonconforming uses or nonconforming property design by amortization - limitation on extraterritorial condemnation by municipalities - definitions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to protect property rights, without the consent of the owner of the property, private property shall not be taken or damaged by the state or any political subdivision for a public or private use without just compensation.

For purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section, “public use” shall not include the taking of private property for transfer to a private entity for the purpose of economic development or enhancement of tax revenue. Private property may otherwise be taken solely for the purpose of furthering a public use.

By enacting subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the general assembly does not intend to create a new procedural mechanism to bring about the condemnation of private property. By enacting subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the general assembly intends to limit only as provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), and not expand, the definition of “public use”.

Nothing in this section shall affect the right of a private party to condemn property as otherwise provided by law.

In all cases in which compensation is not made by the state in its corporate capacity, such compensation shall be ascertained by a board of commissioners of not less than three disinterested and impartial freeholders pursuant to section 38-1-105 (1) or by a jury when required by the owner of the property as prescribed in section 38-1-106. All questions and issues, except the amount of compensation, shall be determined by the court unless all parties interested in the action stipulate and agree that the compensation may be so ascertained by the court. In the event of such stipulation and agreement, the court shall proceed as provided in this article for the trial of such causes by a board of commissioners or jury.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any condemnation action, without the consent of the owner of the property, the burden of proof is on the condemning entity to demonstrate, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the taking of private property is for a public use, unless the condemnation action involves a taking for the eradication of blight, in which case the burden of proof is on the condemning entity to demonstrate, by clear and convincing evidence, that the taking of the property is necessary for the eradication of blight.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a local government shall not enact or enforce an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that requires a nonconforming property use that was lawful at the time of its inception to be terminated or eliminated by amortization.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2006, p. 1749, § 1, effective June 6, 2006.)

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The acquisition by condemnation by a home rule or statutory municipality of property outside of its territorial boundaries involves matters of both statewide and local concern because such acquisition by condemnation may interfere with the plans and operations of other local governments and of the state.

In order that each local government and the state enjoy the greatest flexibility with respect to the planning and development of land within its territorial boundaries, it is necessary that the powers of a home rule or statutory municipality to acquire by condemnation property outside of its territorial boundaries be limited to the narrowest extent permitted by article XX of the state constitution.

Effective January 1, 2004, no home rule or statutory municipality shall either acquire by condemnation property located outside of its territorial boundaries nor provide any funding, in whole or in part, for the acquisition by condemnation by any other public or private party of property located outside of its territorial boundaries; except that the requirements of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to condemnation for water works, light plants, power plants, transportation systems, heating plants, any other public utilities or public works, or for any purposes necessary for such uses.

Effective January 1, 2004, no home rule or statutory municipality shall either acquire by condemnation property located outside of its territorial boundaries for the purpose of parks, recreation, open space, conservation, preservation of views or scenic vistas, or for similar purposes, nor provide any funding, in whole or in part, for the acquisition by condemnation by any other private or public party of property located outside of its territorial boundaries for the purpose of parks, recreation, open space, conservation, preservation of views or scenic vistas, or for similar purposes except where the municipality has obtained the consent of both the owner of the property to be acquired by condemnation and the governing body of the local government in which territorial boundaries the property is located.

Effective January 1, 2004, the provisions of this subsection (4) shall supersede any inconsistent statutory provisions whether contained in this title or any other title of the Colorado Revised Statutes.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Local government” means a county, city and county, town, or home rule or statutory city.

“Political subdivision” means a county; city and county; city; town; service authority; school district; local improvement district; law enforcement authority; urban renewal authority; city or county housing authority; water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district; or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to law.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1058.

G.S.

C. § 237.

R.S. 08:

§ 2415.

C.L.

§ 6311.

CSA:

C. 61, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-1.

L. 61:

P. 370, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 972, § 1, effective February 17.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2667, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(4) added, p. 1747, § 6, effective June 4.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (5) added, p. 1749, § 1, effective June 6.

38-1-101.5.
Necessity of taking land for pipelines.

When a court is determining the necessity of taking private land or nonfederal public land for the installation of a pipeline, the court shall require the pipeline company:

To show that the particular land lies within a route which is the most direct route practicable;

To post a bond with the court equal to double the amount which the court determines to be the estimated cost of restoring the affected land to the same or as good a condition as it was in prior to the installation of the pipeline; except that the pipeline company may elect to deposit cash, negotiable bonds of the United States government or any political subdivision of this state, or negotiable certificates of deposit of any bank or other savings institution organized or transacting business in the United States equal to double such cost. Said bond shall not be released until the court is satisfied that the condemned land has been restored to the same or as good a condition as existed prior to the installation of the pipeline, and, if the affected land is productive agricultural land, that the soil which sustains the agricultural activity has been restored so as to provide for the continuation of such agricultural activity, and that any damages awarded by the court have been paid. If the condemned land is adjacent to or in proximity of the boundary of federal land of comparable use, such bond shall not be released until the company has restored the land to at least the same reclamation standards and meets such other standards and requirements for such federal land as required by the laws, rules, and regulations of the federal government.

To consider existing utility rights-of-way before any new routes are taken if the land to be condemned is adjacent to existing utility rights-of-way.

When land is condemned for a pipeline, the determination of the amount of compensation to be received by the landowner shall reflect consideration of the fact that the condemned land is to be restored as required in this section.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1444, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 84:

(1)(b) amended, p. 974, § 1, effective April 12.

38-1-101.7.
Limitations on the use of right-of-way.

No easement or right-of-way for pipelines shall be used by the owner thereof or employees of such owner for any purpose other than to construct, lay, install, replace, operate, inspect, maintain, repair, renew, substitute, monitor, change the size of, and remove certain facilities placed within the easement by such owner.

The owner of an easement or right-of-way shall mitigate any erosion of the land within the easement or right-of-way caused by the owner of such easement.

History.

Source:
L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 975, § 2, effective April 12.

38-1-102.
Petition - contents - parties.

In all cases where the right to take private property for public or private use without the owner’s consent or the right to construct or maintain any railroad, spur or side track, public road, toll road, ditch, bridge, ferry, telegraph, flume, or other public or private work or improvement which may damage property not actually taken is conferred by general laws or special charter upon any corporate or municipal authority, public body, officer or agent, person, commissioner, or corporation and the compensation to be paid for, in respect of property sought to be appropriated or damaged for the purposes mentioned, cannot be agreed upon by the parties interested; or, in case the owner of the property is incapable of consenting, or his name or residence is unknown, or he is a nonresident of the state, it is lawful for the party authorized to take or damage the property so required to apply to the judge of the district court where the property or any part thereof is situate by filing with the clerk a petition, setting forth, by reference, his authority in the premises, the purpose for which said property is sought to be taken or damaged, a description of the property, the names of all persons interested as owners or otherwise, as appearing of record, if known, or, if not known, stating that fact, and praying such judge to cause the compensation to be paid to the owner to be assessed. If the proceedings seek to affect the property of persons under guardianship, the guardians or conservators of persons having conservators shall be made parties defendant. Persons interested whose names are unknown may be made parties defendant by the description of the unknown owners. In all such cases an affidavit shall be filed by or on behalf of the petitioner, setting forth that the names of such persons are unknown.

In cases where the property is sought to be taken or damaged by the state for the purpose of establishing, operating, or maintaining any state house or charitable or other state institution or improvement, the petition shall be signed by the governor or such other person as he directs or as is provided by law.

Under the provisions of this section, private property may be taken for private use, for private ways of necessity, and for reservoirs, drains, flumes, or ditches on or across the lands of others for agricultural, mining, milling, domestic, or sanitary purposes.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1059.

G.S.

C. § 238.

L. 1885:

P. 200, § 1.

L. 01:

P. 173, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2416.

C.L.

§ 6312.

CSA:

C. 61, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-2.

L. 55:

P. 368, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-2.

L. 64:

P. 265, § 154.

38-1-103.
Summons - return - publication.

A summons shall be issued and served and proof of service shall be made in accordance with the Colorado rules of civil procedure. The contents of such summons shall be in conformity with said rules; except that it shall notify the respondent or defendant that, upon failure to appear and defend, the court, without further notice, shall cause the compensation to be determined and title vested in the petitioner according to law. When it appears that the owners of the property sought to be condemned cannot be personally served as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure, an affidavit shall be filed in said cause by the petitioner or his attorney, setting forth that the person making such affidavit has made diligent inquiry and has been unable to learn the whereabouts of such owners.

The court shall then order a notice to be published in some newspaper published in said county, addressed to such owners, in which notice shall be stated the name of the petitioner, a full and accurate description of the property sought to be taken or condemned, the purpose for which such condemnation is asked, the time and place at which such owners are required to appear, and the title of the court or name of the judge before whom said application is to be heard. The court shall also fix and determine when said notice shall be made returnable, but in no case shall it be made returnable in less than thirty days. The same shall be published at least four times in some weekly newspaper before the return day thereof. If there is no weekly newspaper published in the county in which such proceedings are had, the court shall direct that said notice be published in some newspaper, named by him, published in the nearest convenient place to such county.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1061.

L. 1879:

P. 58, § 1.

G.S.

C. § 240.

R.S. 08:

§ 2418.

C.L.

§ 6314.

CSA:

C. 61, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-4.

L. 55:

P. 369, § 2.

L. 61:

P. 370, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-4.

38-1-104.
Trial - amendments - rules.

No cause shall be heard earlier than thirty days after service upon the defendant or upon due publication as provided in section 38-1-103. Any number of separate parcels of property situate in the same county may be included in one petition, and the compensation for each shall be assessed separately by the same or different commissions or juries, as the court may direct. Amendment to the petition or to any paper or record in the cause may be permitted whenever necessary to a fair trial and final determination of the questions involved. Should it become necessary at any stage of the proceeding to bring a new party before the court, the court has the power to make such rule or order in relation thereto as may be deemed reasonable and proper, and also has the power to make all necessary rules and orders for notice to parties of the pendency of the proceeding and to issue all process necessary to the execution of orders and judgments as they may be entered.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1062.

G.S.

C. § 241.

R.S. 08:

§ 2419.

C.L.

§ 6315.

CSA:

C. 61, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-5.

L. 55:

P. 370, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-5.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1194, § 2, effective June 6.

38-1-105.
Adjournment - commission - compensation - defective title - withdrawal of deposit.

The court may adjourn the proceedings from time to time and shall direct any further notice thereof to be given that may seem proper. The court shall hear proofs and allegations of all parties interested touching the regularity of the proceedings and shall rule upon all objections thereto. Unless a jury is requested by the owner of the property as provided in section 38-1-106, the court shall appoint a board of commissioners of not less than three disinterested and impartial freeholders to determine compensation in the manner provided in this article to be allowed to the owner and persons interested in the lands, real estate, claims, or other property proposed to be taken or damaged in such county for the purposes alleged in the petition. The court shall fix the time and place for the first meeting of such commissioners. Such meeting shall be held at least thirty days prior to the date scheduled for the trial to determine compensation. At the meeting, a voir dire examination shall be conducted by the court and the parties to determine whether the proposed commissioners are disinterested and impartial freeholders. If the court determines that any of the proposed commissioners is not disinterested and impartial, the court shall replace such person and appoint another commissioner, who shall also be subject to voir dire examination. At the hearing to determine compensation, the court shall administer an oath to the commissioners, shall instruct them in writing as to their duties, and, at the conclusion of the testimony, shall instruct them in writing as to the applicable and proper law to be followed by them in arriving at their ascertainment. The court shall fix reasonable compensation for the services and expenses of said commissioners and shall provide the services of a court reporter to record all proceedings had by the commissioners.

The commissioners, before entering upon the duties of their office, shall take an oath to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as commissioners, and any one of them may administer oaths to witnesses produced before them. The commissioners may request the court or clerk thereof to issue subpoenas to compel witnesses to attend the proceedings and testify as in other civil cases and may adjourn and hold meetings for that purpose. They may request the court to make rulings upon the propriety of the proof or objections of the parties. They shall hear the proofs and allegations of the parties according to the rules of evidence and, after viewing the premises or other property and without fear, favor, or partiality, shall ascertain and certify the proper compensation to be made to said owner or parties interested for the lands, real estate, claims, or other property to be taken or affected, as well as all damages accruing to the owner or parties interested in consequence of the condemnation of the same. The commissioners shall make, subscribe, and file with the clerk of the court in which such proceedings are had a certificate of their ascertainment and assessment, in which such lands, real estate, claims, or other property shall be described with convenient certainty and accuracy.

The court, upon the filing of such certificate or returning of a verdict of a jury as provided in section 38-1-107 and due proof that such compensation and separate sums, if any, are certified or found to have been paid to the parties entitled to the same or have been deposited to the credit of such parties in court or with the clerk of the court for that purpose, shall make and cause to be entered in its minutes a rule describing such lands, real estate, claims, or other property, such ascertainment or compensation with the mode of making it, and each payment or deposit of the compensation, a certified copy of which shall be recorded and indexed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the proper county in like manner and with like effect as if it were a deed of conveyance from the owner and parties interested to the proper parties. If there is more than one person interested as owner or otherwise in the property and they are unable to agree upon the nature, extent, or value of their respective interests in the total amount of compensation so ascertained and assessed on an undivided basis by either a commission or a jury, the nature, extent, or value of said interests shall thereupon be determined according to law in a separate and subsequent proceeding and distribution made among the several claimants thereto.

Upon the entry of such rule, the petitioner shall become seized in fee unless a lesser interest has been sought, except as provided in this section, of all such lands, real estate, claims, or other property described in said rule as required to be taken, and may take possession and hold and use the same for the purposes specified in such petition, and shall thereupon be discharged from all claims for any damages by reason of any matter specified in such petition, certificate, or rule of said court. No right-of-way or easement acquired by condemnation shall ever give the petitioner any right, title, or interest to any vein, ledge, lode, deposit, oil, natural gas, or other mineral resource found or existing in the premises condemned, except insofar as the same may be required for subsurface support.

If at any time after an attempted or actual ascertainment of compensation under this article or any purchase or by donation to said petitioner of any lands, real estate, claims, or other property for purposes specified in the petition it appears that the title acquired thereby, to all or any part of such lands for the use of such petitioner, is defective or if said assessment fails or is deemed defective, the petitioner may proceed and perfect such title by procuring an ascertainment of the proper compensation to be made to any person who has title, claim, or interest in or lien upon such lands, real estate, claims, or other property and by making payment thereof in the manner provided in section 38-1-112, as near as may be.

At any stage of such new proceedings or of any proceedings under this article, the court, by rule in that behalf made, may authorize the petitioner, if already in possession, to use, and, if not in possession, to take possession of and use, said premises during the pendency and until the final conclusion of such proceedings and may stay all actions and proceedings against such petitioner on account thereof, if such petitioner pays a sufficient sum into court, or to the clerk thereof, to pay the compensation in that behalf when ascertained. The court wherein any such proceedings are had shall determine the amount such petitioner is required to pay or deposit pending any such ascertainment. In every case where possession is so authorized, it is lawful for either party to conduct the proceedings to a conclusion, if the same are delayed by the other party.

Upon proper application to the court or by stipulation between the parties, the owner may withdraw from the sum so deposited an amount not to exceed three-fourths of the highest valuation evidenced or testimony presented by the petitioner at the hearing for possession, unless the petitioner agrees to a larger withdrawal, if all parties interested in the property sought to be acquired consent and agree to such withdrawal. Any such withdrawal of said deposit shall be a partial payment of the amount of total compensation to be paid and shall be deducted by the clerk of the court from any award or verdict entered thereafter.

The petitioner shall not take possession of the property sought to be taken or condemned earlier than thirty days after service of the summons upon the defendant, unless the owner consents to such possession prior to the expiration of the thirty-day period.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1063.

G.S.

C. § 242.

R.S. 08:

§ 2420.

C.L.

§ 6316.

CSA:

C. 61, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-6.

L. 61:

P. 371, § 3.

L. 63:

P. 476, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-6.

L. 66:

P. 27, § 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 972, § 2, effective February 17.

L. 85:

(6)(c) added, p. 1194, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2008:

(4) amended, p. 627, § 1, effective August 5.

38-1-106.
Jury.

The owner of the property involved in any proceeding brought under the provisions of this article, before the appointment of commissioners, as provided in section 38-1-105, and before the expiration of the time for the defendant to appear and answer, may demand a jury of freeholders residing in the county in which the petition is filed to determine the compensation to be allowed in the manner provided in this article. Such demand may be made in the pleadings or by a separate writing filed with the clerk. Such jury shall consist of six persons, unless a larger number is demanded by any party to the proceeding. In no case shall the number of jurors exceed twelve. Any party so demanding a larger number than six jurors shall advance the fees for such additional jurors for one day’s service according to the rate allowed jurors in the district court.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1064.

G.S.

C. § 243.

L. 1889:

P. 156, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2421.

C.L.

§ 6317.

CSA:

C. 61, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-7.

L. 61:

P. 374, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-7.

L. 66:

P. 30, § 2.

38-1-107.
Inspection of premises - expenses - verdict.

When the jury has been selected and the jurors have taken an oath faithfully and impartially to discharge their duties, the court, at the request of any party to the proceeding and in the discretion of the court, may order that the jury go upon the premises sought to be taken or damaged, in charge of a sworn bailiff, and examine the premises in person. Such order shall require the party making such request to advance a sum, to be fixed by the court in such order, sufficient in the opinion of the court to defray the necessary expenses of such examination. In default of such party forthwith advancing such sum, such order shall be held for naught upon such trial before a jury. The court shall preside in the same manner and with like powers as in other cases. Evidence shall be admitted or rejected by the court according to the rules of law. At the conclusion of the evidence, the matters in controversy may be argued by counsel to the jury. At the conclusion of the arguments, the court shall instruct the jury in writing. The jury shall retire for deliberation, in charge of a sworn officer, and when they have agreed upon a verdict the same shall be returned into court.

If the jury fails to agree, it may be discharged by the court. Thereupon another jury shall be summoned as soon as practicable, in the same manner as before, and like proceedings be had with such jury or successive juries, until a verdict is had. Any party feeling aggrieved by such verdict may move before such court for a new trial in the same manner and for the same causes as in actions at law. The refusal of such court to grant a new trial may be excepted to and assigned for appeal.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1067.

G.S.

C. § 246.

L. 1889:

P. 157, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2424.

C.L.

§ 6320.

CSA:

C. 61, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-10.

38-1-108.
Order of possession.

The court, upon such verdict, shall proceed to adjudge and make such order as to right and justice shall pertain, ordering that the petitioner enter upon such property and the use of the same, upon payment of full compensation as ascertained. Such order with evidence of such payment shall constitute complete justification of the taking of such property.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1068.

G.S.

C. § 247.

R.S. 08:

§ 2425.

C.L.

§ 6321.

CSA:

C. 61, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-11.

38-1-109.
Intervention - cross petition.

Any person not made a party to such proceeding may become such by filing a cross petition at any time before the hearing, setting forth that he is an owner or has an interest in the property sought to be taken or damaged by the petitioner and stating the character and extent of such interest. The rights of such person shall thereupon be fully considered and determined. Except for such cross petition, there shall be no written pleadings on the part of any party to the proceeding, but, at the hearing provided for in section 38-1-105, the court shall hear and dispose of all objections that may be raised touching the legal sufficiency of the petition or cross petition or the regularity of the proceedings in any other respect. In case any person or corporation at any time or in any manner succeeds to the right of any party in the subject matter of the proceeding, such proceeding shall not abate thereby, but such person or corporation, upon motion and upon proof of the fact of such succession, shall be substituted for such party as a party to the proceeding.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1069.

G.S.

C. § 248.

L. 1889:

P. 158, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2426.

C.L.

§ 6322.

CSA:

C. 61, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-12.

38-1-110.
Appellate review.

In all cases, upon final determination thereof in the district court, the judgment is subject to appellate review as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1070.

G.S.

C. § 249.

R.S. 08:

§ 2427.

C.L.

§ 6323.

CSA:

C. 61, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-13.

L. 64:

P. 266, § 156.

38-1-111.
Possession pending appeal.

In cases in which compensation is ascertained, if the owner of the property taken or affected prosecutes an appeal as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules, the petitioner may pay into court or to the clerk thereof the amount of compensation ascertained and awarded for the use of the owner and shall thereupon be entitled to take possession and use the property taken or affected the same as if no such appeal had been taken. The money so deposited shall remain on deposit until such appeal has been heard and determined. If the owner elects to receive such money before the determination of said appeal, the appeal shall thereupon be dismissed so far as such owner is concerned. If the appeal is taken by the petitioner, the amount of compensation shall nevertheless be paid into court or to the clerk thereof for the use of the owner of the property condemned or affected before such petitioner has the right to take possession of and use said property so condemned or affected. Such compensation may be paid to such owner, at any time before the determination of such appeal, upon the execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond by such owner with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by said court, in a sum double the amount of such compensation, conditioned that such owner will pay and refund to such petitioner all or such part of said sum as said owner may be required or adjudged to pay said petitioner, together with the cost of said appeal.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1071.

G.S.

C. § 250.

R.S. 08:

§ 2428.

C.L.

§ 6324.

CSA:

C. 61, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-14.

38-1-112.
Payment to clerk or owner.

Payment of compensation adjudged may in all cases be made to the court or the clerk thereof, who shall on demand pay the same to the party entitled thereto, taking receipt therefor. Payment may be made to the party entitled thereto or to his conservator or guardian.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1072.

G.S.

C. § 251.

R.S. 08:

§ 2429.

C.L.

§ 6325.

CSA:

C. 61, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-15.

38-1-113.
Verdict recorded.

The court shall cause the verdict of the jury and the judgment of said court to be entered upon the records of said court.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1073.

G.S.

C. § 252.

R.S. 08:

§ 2430.

C.L.

§ 6326.

CSA:

C. 61, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-16.

38-1-114.
Formula for computing compensation - definitions.

Except for the provisions of subsection (2) of this section that shall apply to acquisitions for highways and transportation projects undertaken by the regional transportation district created by article 9 of title 32, C.R.S., the right to compensation and the amount thereof, including damages and benefits, if any, shall be determined initially as of the date the petitioner is authorized by agreement, stipulation, or court order to take possession or the date of trial or hearing to assess compensation, whichever is earlier, but any amount of compensation determined initially shall remain subject to adjustment for one year after the date of the initial determination to provide for additional damages or benefits not reasonably foreseeable at the time of the initial determination. In estimating the value of all property actually taken, the true and actual value at such time shall be allowed and awarded. No deduction therefrom shall be allowed for any benefit to the residue of said property. In estimating damages occasioned to other portions of the claimant’s property or any part thereof other than that actually taken, the value of the benefits, if any, may be deducted therefrom. In all cases the owner shall receive the full and actual value of all property actually taken. In case the benefit to the property not actually taken exceeds the damages sustained by the owner to the property not actually taken, the owner shall not be required to pay or allow credit for such excess.

For acquisitions for highways and transportation projects undertaken by the regional transportation district created by article 9 of title 32, C.R.S., the right to compensation and the amount thereof, including damages and benefits, if any, shall be determined as of the date the petitioner is authorized by agreement, stipulation, or court order to take possession or the date of trial or hearing to assess compensation, whichever is earlier, but any amount of compensation determined initially shall remain subject to adjustment for one year after the date of the initial determination to provide for additional damages or benefits not reasonably foreseeable at the time of the initial determination.

If an entire tract or parcel of property is condemned, the amount of compensation to be awarded is the reasonable market value of the said property on the date of valuation.

If only a portion of a tract or parcel of land is taken, the damages and special benefits, if any, to the residue of said property shall be determined. When determining damages and special benefits, the appraiser shall take into account a proper discount when the damages and special benefits are forecast beyond one year from the date of appraisal.

In determining the amount of compensation to be paid for such a partial taking, the compensation for the property taken and damages to the residue of said property shall be reduced by the amount of any special benefits which result from the improvement or project, but not to exceed fifty percent of the total amount of compensation to be paid for the property actually taken.

For purposes of this section, “transportation” shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 43-1-102 (6), C.R.S.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1074.

G.S.

C. § 253.

R.S. 08:

§ 2431.

C.L.

§ 6327.

CSA:

C. 61, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-17.

L. 61:

P. 375, § 5.

L. 63:

P. 477, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-17.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1381, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1308, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (3) added, p. 317, § 1, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For discussion of instructions and evidence admissible on determination of agricultural land values, see City and County of Denver v. Minshall, 109 Colo. 31, 121 P.2d 667 (1942), and City and County of Denver v. Quick, 108 Colo. 111, 113 P.2d 999 (1941).

38-1-115.
Contents of report or verdict.

Except as provided in this section, the report of the commissioners or the verdict of the jury shall contain:

An accurate description of the land taken;

The value of the land or property actually taken;

The damages, if any, to the residue of such land or property; and

The amount and value of the benefit.

No findings as to damages and benefits as provided in paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) of this section shall be required in cases involving the total taking of property, nor shall either or both of such findings be required in cases involving the partial taking of property unless evidence thereof has been received by the commissioners or jury.

The report of the commissioners or the verdict of the jury may also contain such other findings or answers to interrogatories as the court in its discretion may require to establish the value of the property condemned on an undivided basis.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 1075.

G.S.

C. § 254.

R.S. 08:

§ 2432.

C.L.

§ 6328.

CSA:

C. 61, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-18.

L. 63:

P. 477, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-18.

L. 66:

P. 30, § 3.

38-1-116.
Interest on award.

The court shall forthwith cause the report of the commissioners or the verdict of the jury to be entered upon the records of the court, and, where possession of the property has been previously taken by the petitioner pursuant to section 38-1-105 (6), it shall add to the amount of any such award interest at the rate established pursuant to section 5-12-106 (2), C.R.S., on and after the date of such possession until the date such award of the commissioners or verdict of the jury is filed with the clerk of the court. No interest shall be allowed on that portion of the award which the owner and others interested received or could have received as a partial payment by withdrawal from the deposit as provided in section 38-1-105 (6), nor shall interest be allowed for the period wherein the trial of the case is delayed or continued by or at the request of the respondent.

History.

Source:
L. 61:

P. 375, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-20.

L. 63:

P. 477, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-19.

L. 66:

P. 31, § 4.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1194, § 4, effective June 6.

38-1-117.
Condemnation of personal property.

Whenever a petitioner is specifically authorized by law to acquire personal property or interests therein by condemnation, the proceedings to acquire the same shall be governed by this article, and the petitioner shall acquire such interest therein as may be sought and specifically described in the petition in condemnation.

History.

Source:
L. 66:

P. 31, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-22.

38-1-118.
Evidence concerning value of property.

Any witness in a proceeding under articles 1 to 7 of this title, in any court of record of this state wherein the value of real property is involved, may state the consideration involved in any recorded transfer of property, otherwise material and relevant, which was examined and utilized by him in arriving at his opinion, if he has personally examined the record and communicated directly and verified the amount of such consideration with either the buyer or seller. Any such testimony shall be admissible as evidence of such consideration and shall remain subject to rebuttal as to the time and actual consideration involved and subject to objections as to its relevancy and materiality.

History.

Source:
L. 61:

P. 376, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-22.

L. 63:

P. 478, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-21.

38-1-119.
Preference on docket.

To assure that property owners receive compensation for the taking of their property at the earliest practical time and to reduce the interest obligation of petitioners, all courts wherein such actions are pending shall give such actions preference over other civil actions therein in the manner of setting the same for trial.

History.

Source:
L. 61:

P. 375, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 50-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-20.

38-1-120.
Acquisition of state lands - department of natural resources.

All proceedings brought by the department of natural resources pursuant to the provisions of section 24-33-107 (3)(a), C.R.S., for the acquisition of interests in state lands under the jurisdiction of the state board of land commissioners shall be as prescribed by this article.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 178, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-1-23.